Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201860-4,137
Operation of commercial motor vehicle; valid commercial driver's
license or valid CLP-commercial learner's permit
required.

Any resident of this state operating a commercial
motor vehicle on the highways of this state shall possess a valid commercial driver's license or a valid CLP-commercial learner's permit issued
pursuant to the
Motor Vehicle Operator's License Act.

Laws 1989, LB 285, § 87;

Laws 1993, LB 7, § 3;

Laws 1993, LB 420, § 7;

Laws 2001, LB 108, § 1;

Laws 2003, LB 562, § 9;

Laws 2005, LB 76, § 9;

Laws 2011, LB178, § 8;

Laws 2014, LB983, § 23.